Colorado, session 2026A, HB1193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 22-1-116 as
follows:
22-1-116. School children - vision and hearing tests.
The sight VISION OF ALL CHILDREN IN PRE-KINDERGARTEN AND THE
VISION and hearing of all children in the kindergarten AND THE first, second,
third, fifth, seventh, and ninth grades, or children in comparable age groups
referred for testing, shall be tested during the school year by the teacher,
principal, or other qualified person authorized by the school district. Each
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

school in the district shall make a record of all sight VISION and hearing
tests given during the school year and record the individual results of each
test on each child's records. The parents or guardian shall MUST be informed
when a deficiency is found. The provisions of this section shall DO not
apply to any child whose parent or guardian objects on religious or personal
grounds.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1193

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1193